Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1108
Independent mental health professional, defined.

Independent mental health professional means a psychiatrist or psychologist with expertise in treating persons with developmental disabilities who has not previously been involved in the treatment of the subject in a significant way.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 8.